Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 5 MEDICAL MARIJUANA LICENSE TYPES
44-10-503. Medical marijuana products manufacturer license - rules - definition.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer license may be issued to a person that manufactures medical marijuana products, pursuant to the terms and conditions of this article 10.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer may cultivate its own medical marijuana if it obtains a medical marijuana cultivation facility license, it may purchase medical marijuana from a medical marijuana store pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, it may purchase medical marijuana from a medical marijuana cultivation facility licensee, or it may purchase medical marijuana from another medical marijuana products manufacturer. A medical marijuana products manufacturer shall track all of its medical marijuana from the point it is either transferred from its medical marijuana cultivation facility or the point when it is delivered to the medical marijuana products manufacturer from a medical marijuana store, medical marijuana cultivation facility licensee, or a medical marijuana products manufacturer to the point of transfer to a medical marijuana store or a medical marijuana products manufacturer or a medical marijuana cultivation facility that has obtained a centralized distribution permit.

Medical marijuana products must be prepared on a licensed premises that is used exclusively for the manufacture and preparation of medical marijuana products and using equipment that is used exclusively for the manufacture and preparation of medical marijuana products; except that, subject to rules of the state licensing authority, a medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee may share the same premises as a commonly owned marijuana research and development licensee so long as virtual or physical separation of inventory and research activity is maintained.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer shall have a written agreement or contract with a medical marijuana store or a medical marijuana products manufacturer, which contract must at a minimum set forth the total amount of medical marijuana obtained from the medical marijuana store or the medical marijuana products manufacturer to be used in the manufacturing process, and the total amount of medical marijuana products to be manufactured from the medical marijuana obtained from the medical marijuana store or the medical marijuana products manufacturer. The medical marijuana products manufacturer may sell its products to any medical marijuana store or to any medical marijuana products manufacturer.

All licensed premises on which medical marijuana products are manufactured must meet the sanitary standards for medical marijuana product preparation promulgated pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(i).

The medical marijuana product must be sealed and conspicuously labeled in compliance with this article 10 and any rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10. The labeling of medical marijuana products is a matter of statewide concern.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer that uses an industrial hemp product as an ingredient in a medical marijuana product shall ensure that the industrial hemp product has passed all testing required by rules promulgated by the state licensing authority pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(d). Prior to taking possession of the industrial hemp product, a medical marijuana products manufacturer shall verify the industrial hemp product passed all testing required for medical marijuana products at a licensed medical marijuana testing facility and that the person transferring the industrial hemp product has received a registration from the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-5-426.

Absent sampling and testing standards established by the department of public health and environment for the sampling and testing of an industrial hemp product, a person transferring an industrial hemp product to a medical marijuana products manufacturer pursuant to this section shall comply with sampling and testing standards consistent with those established by the state licensing authority pursuant to this article 10. The state licensing authority shall report to the department of public health and environment any investigations or findings of violations of this section by a person registered pursuant to section 25-5-426.

Medical marijuana or medical marijuana products may not be consumed on a premises licensed pursuant to this article 10.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, sales of medical marijuana products shall not be exempt from state or local sales tax.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer may provide, except as required by section 44-10-203 (2)(d), a sample of its products to a facility that has a medical marijuana testing facility license from the state licensing authority for testing and research purposes. A medical marijuana products manufacturer shall maintain a record of what was provided to the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the results of the testing.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer shall not:

Add any medical marijuana to a food product where the manufacturer of the food product holds a trademark to the food product's name; except that a medical marijuana products manufacturer may use a trademarked food product if the manufacturer uses the product as a component or as part of a recipe and where the medical marijuana products manufacturer does not state or advertise to the patient that the final medical marijuana product contains a trademarked food product;

Intentionally or knowingly label or package a medical marijuana product in a manner that would cause a reasonable patient confusion as to whether the medical marijuana product was a trademarked food product; or

Label or package a medical marijuana product in a manner that violates any federal trademark law or regulation.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee may provide a medical marijuana concentrate and a medical marijuana product sample to no more than five managers employed by the licensee for purposes of quality control and product development. A medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee may designate no more than five managers per calendar month as recipients of quality control and product development samples authorized pursuant to this subsection (10)(a).

Managers who receive a sample pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section must have a valid registry identification card issued pursuant to section 25-1.5-106 (9).

A sample authorized pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section is limited to one serving size of edible medical marijuana product and its applicable equivalent serving size of nonedible medical marijuana product per batch as defined in rules promulgated by the state licensing authority and one-quarter gram of medical marijuana concentrate per batch as defined in rules promulgated by the state licensing authority; except that the limit is one-half gram of medical marijuana concentrate if the intended use of the final product is to be used in a device that can be used to deliver medical marijuana concentrate in a vaporized form to the person inhaling from the device.

A sample authorized pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section must be labeled and packaged pursuant to the rules promulgated pursuant to section 44-10-203 (2)(f) and (3)(b).

A sample provided pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section must be tracked with the seed-to-sale tracking system. Prior to a manager receiving a sample, a manager must be designated in the seed-to-sale tracking system as a recipient of quality control and product development samples. A manager receiving a sample must make a voluntary decision to be tracked in the seed-to-sale tracking system and is not a consumer pursuant to section 16 (5)(c) of article XVIII of the state constitution. The medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall maintain documentation of all samples and shall make the documentation available to the state licensing authority.

Prior to a manager receiving a sample pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section, a medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall provide a standard operating procedure to the manager explaining requirements pursuant to this section and personal possession limits pursuant to section 18-18-406.

A manager shall not:

Receive more than a total of fifteen grams of medical marijuana concentrate or fourteen individual serving-size edibles or its applicable equivalent in nonedible medical marijuana products per calendar month, regardless of the number of licenses that the manager is associated with; or

Provide to or resell the sample to another licensed employee, a customer, or any other individual.

A medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall not:

Allow a manager to consume the sample on the licensed premises; or

Use the sample as a means of compensation to a manager.

The state licensing authority may establish additional inventory tracking and record keeping, including additional reporting required for implementation. The medical marijuana products manufacturer licensee shall maintain the information required by this subsection (10)(i) on the licensed premises for inspection by the state and local licensing authorities.

For purposes of this subsection (10) only, "manager" means an employee of the medical marijuana products manufacturer who holds a valid key license or associated key license and is currently designated pursuant to state licensing authority rules as the manager of the medical marijuana products manufacturer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed medical marijuana products manufacturer may compensate its employees using performance-based incentives, including sales-based performance-based incentives.

After obtaining passing testing results, a medical marijuana products manufacturer may receive a transfer of retail marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form from a co-located retail marijuana products manufacturer with at least one identical controlling beneficial owner and change the designation of the retail marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form to medical marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form. The medical marijuana products manufacturer shall enter the designation change into the seed-to-sale tracking system and, after the change is entered into the system, the product is a medical marijuana product and is the property of the medical marijuana products manufacturer. A product that changed designation pursuant to this subsection (12)(a) shall not be transferred to the originating retail marijuana products manufacturer or any retail marijuana licensee, have its designation changed from a medical marijuana product, or otherwise be treated as a retail marijuana product.

A transfer and change of designation of retail marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form to medical marijuana that has been extracted and is in a concentrated form pursuant to this subsection (12) is not a transaction that results in a right to refund of any retail marijuana excise tax incurred or paid prior to that transfer and change of designation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2893, § 5, effective January 1, 2020 (see editor's note).

L. 2021:

(12) added, (HB 21-1216), ch. 306, p. 1833, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

44-10-504. Medical marijuana testing facility license - rules.

A medical marijuana testing facility license may be issued to a person who performs testing and research on medical marijuana, industrial hemp products as regulated by part 4 of article 5 of title 25, for medical marijuana licensees, medical marijuana and medical marijuana products for marijuana and research development licensees, and marijuana or marijuana products grown or produced by a registered patient or registered primary caregiver on behalf of a registered patient, upon verification of registration pursuant to section 25-1.5-106 (7)(e) and verification that the patient is a participant in a clinical or observational study conducted by a marijuana research and development licensee, and industrial hemp products as regulated by part 4 of article 5 of title 25. The facility may develop and test medical marijuana products.

The testing of medical marijuana, medical marijuana products, and medical marijuana concentrate, and the associated standards, is a matter of statewide concern.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules pursuant to its authority in section 44-10-202 (1)(c) related to acceptable testing and research practices, including but not limited to testing, standards, quality control analysis, equipment certification and calibration, and chemical identification and other substances used in bona fide research methods.

A person who has an interest in a medical marijuana testing facility license from the state licensing authority for testing purposes shall not have any interest in a licensed medical marijuana store, a licensed medical marijuana cultivation facility, a licensed medical marijuana products manufacturer, a licensed retail marijuana store, a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility, or a licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer. A person that has an interest in a licensed medical marijuana store, a licensed medical marijuana cultivation facility, a licensed medical marijuana products manufacturer, a licensed retail marijuana store, a licensed retail marijuana cultivation facility, or a licensed retail marijuana products manufacturer shall not have an interest in a facility that has a medical marijuana testing facility license.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2897, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-405 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-505. Medical marijuana transporter license - definition.

A medical marijuana transporter license may be issued to a person to provide logistics, distribution, delivery, and storage of medical marijuana and medical marijuana products. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a medical marijuana transporter license is valid for two years. A licensed medical marijuana transporter is responsible for the medical marijuana and medical marijuana products once it takes control of the product.

A licensed medical marijuana transporter may contract with multiple licensed medical marijuana businesses.

On and after July 1, 2017, all medical marijuana transporters shall hold a valid medical marijuana transporter license; except that an entity licensed pursuant to this article 10 that provides its own distribution is not required to have a medical marijuana transporter license to transport and distribute its products. The state licensing authority shall begin accepting applications after January 1, 2017.

A medical marijuana transporter licensee may maintain a licensed premises to temporarily store medical marijuana and medical marijuana products and to use as a centralized distribution point. The licensed premises must be located in a jurisdiction that permits the operation of medical marijuana stores. A licensed medical marijuana transporter may store and distribute medical marijuana and medical marijuana products from this location. A storage facility must meet the same security requirements that are required to obtain a medical marijuana cultivation facility license.

A medical marijuana transporter licensee shall use the seed-to-sale tracking system developed pursuant to section 44-10-202 (1)(a) to create shipping manifests documenting the transport of medical marijuana and medical marijuana products throughout the state.

A medical marijuana transporter licensee may:

Maintain and operate one or more warehouses in the state to handle medical marijuana and medical marijuana products; and

Deliver medical marijuana and medical marijuana products on orders previously taken if the place where orders are taken and delivered is licensed.

There is authorized a medical marijuana delivery permit to a medical marijuana transporter license authorizing the permit holder to deliver medical marijuana and medical marijuana products.
(5) (a) (I) There is authorized a medical marijuana delivery permit to a medical marijuana transporter license authorizing the permit holder to deliver medical marijuana and medical marijuana products.

A medical marijuana delivery permit is valid for one year and may be renewed annually upon renewal of the medical marijuana transporter license.

A medical marijuana delivery permit issued pursuant to this section applies to only one medical marijuana transporter; except that a single medical marijuana delivery permit may apply to multiple medical marijuana transporters if the medical marijuana transporters are in the same local jurisdiction and are identically owned, as defined by the state licensing authority for purposes of this section.

The state licensing authority may issue a medical marijuana delivery permit to a qualified applicant, as determined by the state licensing authority, that holds a medical marijuana transporter license issued pursuant to this article 10. The state licensing authority has discretion in determining whether an applicant is qualified to receive a medical marijuana delivery permit. A medical marijuana delivery permit issued by the state licensing authority is deemed a revocable privilege of a licensed medical marijuana transporter. A violation related to a medical marijuana delivery permit is grounds for a fine or suspension or revocation of the delivery permit or medical marijuana transporter license.

A medical marijuana transporter licensee shall not make deliveries of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products to patients or parents or guardians while also transporting medical marijuana or medical marijuana products between licensed premises in the same vehicle.

A licensed medical marijuana transporter with a medical marijuana delivery permit may deliver medical marijuana and medical marijuana products on behalf of a medical marijuana store only to the patient or parent or guardian who placed the order with a medical marijuana store and who:

Is a current registrant of the medical marijuana patient registry and is twenty-one years of age or older or the parent or guardian of a patient who is also the patient's primary caregiver;

Receives the delivery of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products pursuant to rules; and

Possesses an acceptable form of identification.

In accordance with this subsection (5) and rules adopted to implement this subsection (5), a licensed medical marijuana transporter with a valid medical marijuana delivery permit may:

Not accept orders on behalf of a medical marijuana store and may only pick up already packaged medical marijuana delivery orders from a medical marijuana store or its associated state licensing authority-authorized storage facility as defined by rule and deliver those orders to the appropriate patient, parent, or guardian;

Deliver medical marijuana and medical marijuana products not in excess of the amounts established by the state licensing authority;

Deliver only to a patient or parent or guardian at the address provided in the order;

Deliver no more than once per day to the same patient or residence;

Deliver only to a private residence.

For purposes of this section, "private residences" means private premises where a person lives, such as a private dwelling place or place of habitation, and specifically excludes any premises located at a school or on the campus of an institution of higher education, or any other public property.

Deliver medical marijuana or medical marijuana products only by a motor vehicle that complies with this section and the rules promulgated pursuant to this section and section 44-10-203 (2)(dd); and

Use an employee to conduct deliveries on behalf of, and pursuant to a contract with, a medical marijuana store that has a valid medical marijuana delivery permit from its medical marijuana store or its associated state licensing authority-authorized storage facility as defined by rule.

Prior to transferring possession of the order to a patient or a parent or guardian, the person delivering the order shall inspect the patient's or parent's or guardian's identification and registry identification card issued pursuant to section 25-1.5-106, verify the possession of a valid registry identification card issued pursuant to section 25-1.5-106, and verify that the information provided at the time of the order matches the name and age on the patient's or parent's or guardian's identification.

Any person delivering medical marijuana or medical marijuana products for a medical marijuana transporter must possess a valid occupational license and be a current employee of the medical marijuana transporter licensee with a valid medical marijuana delivery permit; must have undergone training regarding proof-of-age identification and verification, including all forms of identification that are deemed acceptable by the state licensing authority; and must have any other training required by the state licensing authority.

Unless otherwise provided by the state licensing authority by rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10, all requirements applicable to other licenses issued pursuant to this article 10 apply to the delivery of medical marijuana and medical marijuana products, including but not limited to inventory tracking, transportation, and packaging and labeling requirements.

The advertising regulations and prohibitions adopted pursuant to section 44-10-203 (3)(a) apply to medical marijuana delivery operations pursuant to this subsection (5).

It is not a violation of any provision of state, civil, or criminal law for a licensed medical marijuana transporter licensee with a valid medical marijuana delivery permit, or such person who has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of the permit, or its licensees to possess, transport, and deliver medical marijuana and medical marijuana products pursuant to a medical marijuana delivery permit in amounts that do not exceed amounts established by the state licensing authority.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section, delivery of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products is not permitted in any municipality, county, or city and county unless the municipality, county, or city and county, by either a majority of the registered electors of the municipality, county, or city and county voting at a regular election or special election called in accordance with the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31, or the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, as applicable, or a majority of the members of the governing board for the municipality, county, or city and county vote to allow the delivery of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products pursuant to this section.

An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection (5)(i)(I) of this section may prohibit delivery of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products from a medical marijuana store that is outside a municipality's, county's, city's, or city and county's jurisdictional boundaries to an address within its jurisdictional boundaries.

The state licensing authority shall begin issuing medical marijuana delivery permits to qualified medical marijuana transporter applicants on, but not earlier than, January 2, 2021.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2898, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1135), ch. 40, p. 212, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-406 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-506. Medical marijuana business operator license.

A medical marijuana business operator license may be issued to an entity or person who operates a medical marijuana business licensed pursuant to this article 10, for another medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business licensed pursuant to this article 10, and who may receive a portion of the profits as compensation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2901, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-407 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-507. Marijuana research and development license.

A marijuana research and development license may be issued to a person to grow, cultivate, possess, and transfer, by sale or donation, marijuana pursuant to section 44-10-203 (1)(i) or subsection (4) of this section for the limited research purposes identified in subsection (2) of this section.

A license identified in subsection (1) of this section may be issued for the following limited research purposes:

To test chemical potency and composition levels;

To conduct clinical investigations of marijuana-derived medicinal products;

To conduct research on the efficacy and safety of administering marijuana as part of medical treatment;

To conduct genomic, horticultural, or agricultural research; and

To conduct research on marijuana-affiliated products or systems.

As part of the application process for a marijuana research and development license, an applicant shall submit to the state licensing authority a description of the research that the applicant intends to conduct and whether the research will be conducted with a public institution or using public money. If the research will not be conducted with a public institution or with public money, the state licensing authority shall grant the application if it determines that the application meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section.

If the research will be conducted with a public institution or public money, the scientific advisory council established in section 25-1.5-106.5 (3) shall review an applicant's research project to determine that it meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section and to assess the following:

The project's quality, study design, value, or impact;

Whether the applicant has the appropriate personnel; expertise; facilities; infrastructure; funding; and human, animal, or other approvals in place to successfully conduct the project; and

Whether the amount of marijuana to be grown by the applicant is consistent with the project's scope and goals.

If the scientific advisory council determines that the research project does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section or assesses the criteria in this subsection (3) to be inadequate, the application must be denied.

A marijuana research and development licensee may only transfer, by sale or donation, marijuana grown within its operation to other marijuana research and development licensees. The state licensing authority may impose sanctions on a marijuana research and development license for violations of this subsection (4) and any other violation of this article 10.

A marijuana research and development licensee may contract to perform research in conjunction with a public higher education research institution or another marijuana research and development licensee.

The growing, cultivating, possessing, or transferring, by sale or donation, of marijuana in accordance with this section and the rules adopted pursuant to it, by a marijuana research and development licensee, is not a criminal or civil offense under state law. A marijuana research and development license must be issued in the name of the applicant and must specify the location in Colorado at which the marijuana research and development licensee intends to operate. A marijuana research and development licensee shall not allow any other person to exercise the privilege of the license.

If the research conducted includes a public institution or public money, the scientific advisory council shall review any reports made by marijuana research and development licensees under state licensing authority rule and provide the state licensing authority with its determination on whether the research project continues to meet research qualifications pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2902, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-408 as it existed prior to 2020.